Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.02
Act, purposes.

The purposes of the Critical Infrastructure Utility Worker Protection Act are to:

(1) Provide for protection of critical infrastructure utility workers during any civil defense emergency, disaster, or emergency;

(2) Provide priority access to personal protective equipment; medical screening, testing, and preventative health services; medical treatment; and the administration of vaccines for critical infrastructure utility workers in the event of an emergency involving a severe threat to human health; and

(3) Authorize federal and state financial aid for critical infrastructure utility workers during any civil defense emergency, disaster, or emergency involving a severe threat to human health.

Laws 2023, LB191, § 3.